Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE 8

UNAUTHORIZED
INSURERS AND SURPLUS LINES

Cross References

Insurance policies issued to construction professionals, see
§431:1-217.

PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§431:8-101 Scope. This article shall
apply to the placement of insurance in insurers not authorized to transact insurance
in the state in which the subject resident is located or in which the insurance
contract will be performed. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 68, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next